da: Undertype for spinner: Bucktail-spinner; Buzzbait; Flasher; Inline-spinner; Spin-tail-jig; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Andet
sk-SK: Podtyp odstredivky: Rotačka typu bucktail; Buzzbait; Záblesková nástraha; Inline rotačka; Jig s rotačným chvostom; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Iné
zh-CN: 旋式诱饵子类型: 鹿尾亮片; 蜂鸣亮片; 闪光亮片; 直排亮片; 亮片尾铅头钩; 复合亮片; 下旋亮片; 其他
es: Subtipo de ruedas giratorias: Cucharilla bucktail; Buzzbait; Flasher; Cucharilla en línea; Jig de cola giratoria; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Otro
ro-RO: Subtip de nălucă rotativă: Rotativă bucktail; Buzzbait; Flasher; Rotativă inline; Jig spin-tail; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Altele
sv: Underkategori för spinner: Bucktail-spinnare; Buzzbait; Flasher; Inline-spinnare; Spintail-jigg; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Annat
nb: Undetype av spinner: Bucktail-spinner; Buzzbait; Blink; Inline-spinner; Spin-tail-jigg; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Annet
pt-PT: Subtipo de spinner: Bucktail spinner; Buzzbait; Flasher; Spinner em linha; Jig spin-tail; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Outro
ko: 스피너 세부 유형: 벅테일 스피너; 버즈베이트; 플래셔; 인라인 스피너; 스핀테일 지그; 스피너베이트; 언더스핀; 기타
nl: Subtype spinner: Bucktail-spinner; Buzzbait; Flasher; Inline spinner; Spin-tail jig; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Overige
hu: Pörgettyű altípusa: Bucktail körforgó; Buzzbait; Flasher; Inline körforgó; Spin-tail jig; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Egyéb
fi: Vieheen alatyyppi: Bucktail-lippauistin; Buzzbait; Houkutuslevy; Lippauistin; Spintail-jigi; Spinnerbait; Underspin-jigi; Muu
pl: Podtyp błystki: Błystka z sierścią (bucktail); Buzzbait; Flasher; Błystka obrotowa; Wirujący ogonek; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Inne
ja: スピナーサブタイプ: バックテールスピナー; バズベイト; フラッシャー; インラインスピナー; スピンテールジグ; スピナーベイト; アンダースピン; その他
lt-LT: Suktuko potipis: „Bucktail“ sukrė; „Buzzbait“; Blizgė; Sukrė; „Spin-tail“ džigas; „Spinnerbait“; Apatinės sukrės masalas („Underspin“); Kita
sl-SI: Podvrsta vrtavke: Bucktail blestivka; Buzzbait; Flasher; Linearna blestivka; Jig z vrtljivim repom; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Drugo
ru: Подтип спиннера: Бактейл; Баззбейт; Флешер; Инлайн вертушка; Тейл-спиннер; Спиннербейт; Андерспин; Другое
th: ประเภทย่อยของเหยื่อหมุน: บั๊กเทลสปินเนอร์; บัซเบท; แฟลชเชอร์; อินไลน์สปินเนอร์; สปินเทลจิ๊ก; สปินเนอร์เบท; อันเดอร์สปิน; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại phụ của mồi cá giả spinner: Mồi spinner bucktail; Mồi buzzbait; Mồi flasher; Mồi spinner inline; Mồi jig đuôi xoay; Mồi spinnerbait; Mồi underspin; Khác
fr: Sous-type Spinner: Cuiller bucktail; Buzzbait; Flasher; Cuiller tournante; Leurre plombé à palette; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Autre
it: Sottotipo di spinner: Bucktail spinner; Buzzbait; Flasher; Inline spinner; Spin-tail jig; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Altro
de: Spinner-Untertyp: Bucktail-Spinner; Buzzbait; Flasher; Inline-Spinner; Spin-Tail-Jig; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Sonstige
en: Spinner subtype: Bucktail spinner; Buzzbait; Flasher; Inline spinner; Spin-tail jig; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Other
bg-BG: Подтип на спинер: Блесна тип Bucktail; Бъзбайт; Флашер; Въртяща се блесна (Inline); Джиг със спин-опашка; Спинербайт; Ъндърспин; Друго
tr: Spinner alt türü: Bucktail spinner; Buzzbait; Flaşör; Sıralı spinner; Spin-tail jig; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Diğer
hr-HR: Podvrsta spinnera: Bucktail leptir; Buzzbait; Flasher; Inline leptir varalica; Spin-tail jig; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Ostalo
el: Επιμέρους τύπος περιστρεφόμενου εξαρτήματος: Bucktail spinner; Buzzbait; Flasher; Inline spinner; Spin-tail jig; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Άλλο
zh-TW: 旋轉器子類型: 鹿毛旋轉亮片; 噪音餌; 閃光誘餌; 直列旋轉亮片; 旋尾汲頭餌; 複合亮片; 底旋汲頭餌; 其他
cs: Podtyp spinneru: Třpytka bucktail; Buzzbait; Flasher; Rotační třpytka; Jig s rotačním ocáskem; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Jiné
pt-BR: Subtipo do ícone de carregamento: Spinner bucktail; Buzzbait; Flasher; Spinner inline; Jig spin-tail; Spinnerbait; Underspin; Outros